Illinois, session 104th, SB2326.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Park District Code is amended by adding 5Section 8-17.5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1205/8-17.5 new)7    Sec. 8-17.5. Playground fencing. Every park district shall 8install fencing that encompasses each playground that is 9located on land that is owned or controlled by the park 10district if the playground is also located in a high-traffic 11urban area. As used in this Section, "playground" means an 12improved outdoor area designed, equipped, and set aside for 13children's play that is not intended for use as an athletic 14playing field. 15    Section 10. The Chicago Park District Act is amended by 16adding Section 26.10-13 as follows: 17    (70 ILCS 1505/26.10-13 new)18    Sec. 26.10-13. Playground fencing. The Chicago Park 19District shall install fencing that encompasses each 20playground that is located on land that is owned controlled by 21the Chicago Park District if the playground is also located in   SB2326- 2 -LRB104 11916 RTM 22007 b1a high-traffic urban area of Cook County. As used in this 2Section, "playground" means an improved outdoor area designed, 3equipped, and set aside for children's play that is not 4intended for use as an athletic playing field.